Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-173
Board; liability; exemption; when.

No member of a board, no expert retained by the department, and no member of a profession who provides consultation to or testimony for the department shall be liable in damages to any person for slander, libel, defamation of character, breach of any privileged communication, or otherwise for any action taken or recommendation made within the scope of the functions of such board or expert or the consultation or testimony given by such person, if such board member, expert, or person acts without malice and in the reasonable belief that such action, recommendation, consultation, or testimony is warranted by the facts known to him or her after a reasonable effort is made to obtain the facts on which such action is taken, recommendation is made, or consultation or testimony is provided.

Laws 1976, LB 877, § 24;

Laws 1986, LB 286, § 71;

Laws 1986, LB 579, § 63;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 398;

Laws 1999, LB 828, § 52;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-161.19;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 73.